apertium-sme-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="v/inne__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>int</l>       <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnen</l>     <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unnet</l>     <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>int</l>       <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnet</l>     <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inte</l>      <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inte</l>      <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innende</l>   <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inne</l>      <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innes</l>     <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>int</l>       <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnet</l>     <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inner</l>     <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innes</l>     <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ann</l>       <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inte</l>      <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="bestr/i__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idd</l>        <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>        <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idd</l>        <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>        <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idte</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idte</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iende</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idd</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eid</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ei</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kn/este__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>esten</l>        <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>estet</l>        <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>estet</l>        <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>estne</l>        <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>estne</l>        <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>estende</l>      <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>estes</l>     <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>estet</l>     <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ester</l>     <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>estes</l>     <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/ørre__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørra</l>         <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørret</l>        <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørra</l>         <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørret</l>        <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørra</l>         <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørrede</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørrete</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørra</l>         <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørrede</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørrete</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørrende</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ørr</l>       <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørre</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørres</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ordt</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørra</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørret</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>urdt</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørrer</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørres</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orde</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørra</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørret</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>urde</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="vinne">           <i>v</i><par n="v/inne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tørre">           <i>t</i><par n="t/ørre__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kneste"><i>kn</i><par n="kn/este__vblex_adj"/></e>
